Utah statutes.
63I-4-203.   Board accounting method.
The board by rule made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, shall establish an accounting method that:
(1)  is similar to generally accepted accounting principles used by a private
enterprise;
(2)  allows an agency to identify the total actual cost of engaging in a
commercial activity in a manner similar to how a private enterprise identifies
the total actual cost to the private enterprise, including the following:
(a)  a labor expense, such as:
(i)  compensation and benefits;
(ii)  a cost of training;
(iii)  a cost of paying overtime;
(iv)  a cost of supervising labor; or
(v)  another personnel expense;
(b)  an operating cost, such as:
(i)  vehicle maintenance and repair;
(ii)  a marketing, advertising, or other sales expense;
(iii)  an office expense;
(iv)  a cost of an accounting operation, such as billing;
(v)  an insurance expense;
(vi)  a real estate or equipment cost;
(vii)  a debt service cost; or
(viii)  a proportionate amount of other overhead or of a capital expense, such
as vehicle depreciation and depreciation of other fixed assets;
(c)  a contract management cost; and
(d)  another cost particular to a person supplying the good or service; and
(3)  provides a process to estimate the taxes an agency would pay related to
engaging in a commercial activity if the agency were required to pay federal,
state, and local taxes to the same extent as a private enterprise engaging in
the commercial activity.
